Utah, session 2026, SB52.
Section 1. Section 53E-6-901 is amended to read:53E-6-901. Substitute teachers.(1)As used in this section, "substitute teacher" means a licensed or non-licensed individual who is employed by a school district to fill in for a regular classroom teacher during the teacher's temporary absence from the classroom.(2)When hiring substitute teachers, school districts shall prioritize licensed educators as substitutes when available.(3)An individual shall submit to a background check in accordance with Section 53G-11-402 prior to employment as a substitute teacher.(4)A teacher's position in the classroom may not be filled by a non-licensed substitute teacher for more than a total of 20 days during any school year unless a licensed educator is not available.(5)(4)An individual who is ineligible to hold a license for reasons described in Title 53E, Chapter 6, Part 6, License Denial and Discipline, may not serve as a substitute teacher.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.